en: Calf sweetbread
fr: Ris de veau

en: Pan-fried calf sweetbread, Sautéed calf sweetbread
fr: Ris de veau braisé, Ris de veau sauté, Ris de veau poêlé

en: Meat for osso buco, osso buco meat
fr: Viande pour osso buco

en: Veal knuckle, Veal shank, veal meat for osso buco, osso buco veal meat
fr: Jarret de veau, viande de veau pour osso buco

en: Boiled veal knuckle, Boiled veal shank
fr: Jarret de veau bouilli

en: Braised veal knuckle, Braised veal shank
fr: Jarret de veau braisé

en: Frozen veal knuckle, Frozen veal shank
fr: Jarret de veau surgelé

en: Boiled calf head, Calf head cooked in water
fr: Tête de veau bouillie, Tête de veau cuite à l'eau

en: Braised veal neck, Boiled veal neck
fr: Collier de veau braisé, Collier de veau bouilli

en: Veal neck
fr: Collier de veau

en: Frozen veal neck
fr: Collier de veau surgelé

en: Veal chop
fr: Côte de veau

en: Grilled veal chop, Pan-fried veal chop
fr: Côte de veau grillée, Côte de veau poêlée

en: Frozen veal chop
fr: Côte de veau surgelée

en: Calf kidney
fr: Rognons de veau

en: Sautéed veal kidney, Pan-fried veal kidney
fr: Rognons de veau braisés, Rognons de veau sautés, Rognons de veau poêlés

en: Calf brain
bg: Телешки мозък
fr: Cervelle de veau
hr: Teleći mozak

en: Cooked calf brain
fr: Cervelle de veau cuite

en: Calf liver
bg: Телешки черен дроб
de: Kalbsleber
fr: Foie de veau
hr: Teleća jetra

en: Cooked calf liver
fr: Foie de veau cuit